el: Σχέδιο κολιέ: Με χάντρες; Αλυσίδα; Τσόκερ; Κορδόνι; Χειροπέδα; Λάσο; Κρεμαστό; Ριβιέρα; Δήλωση; Τούφα; Σε σχήμα Y; Άλλο
pl: Konstrukcja naszyjnika: Koralikowy; Łańcuszkowy; Obcisły; Ze sznurka; Bransoletkowy; Lariat; Wisiorek; Riviera; Duży naszyjnik; Co najmniej jeden sznurek; W kształcie litery Y; Inne
fr: Conception du collier: Perlé; Chaîne; Foulard; Corde; Manchette; Lasso; Pendentif; Riviera; Apparat; Brins; En forme de Y; Autre
en: Necklace design: Beaded; Chain; Choker; Cord; Cuff; Lariat; Pendant; Riviera; Statement; Strand; Y-shaped; Other
nl: Ontwerp ketting: Kralen; Ketting; Choker; Koord; Manchet; Lariat; Hanger; Riviera; Statement; Streng; Y-vormig; Andere
de: Halskettendesign: Perlen; Kette; Halsband; Cord; Manschette; Y-Halskette; Anhänger; Riviera; Statement; Strang; Y-förmig; Sonstiges
ko: 목걸이 디자인: 구슬 장식; 체인; 초커; 코드; 커프; 레이어트; 펜던트; 리비에라; 진술; 스트랜드; Y자형; 기타
pt-BR: Design de colar: De contas; Corrente; Gargantilha; Cordão; Bracelete aberto; Laço; Pingente; Riviera; Grande; Filamentos; Em forma de Y; Outro
vi: Thiết kế vòng cổ: Đính cườm; Xích; Vòng cổ; Dây; Cổ tay áo; Lariat; Mặt dây chuyền; Riviera; Tuyên bố; Strand; Hình chữ V; Khác
cs: Design náhrdelníku: Korálkové; Řetěz; Choker; Lanko; Manžeta; Laso; Přívěsek; Riviera; Statement; Pramen; Ve tvaru Y; Jiné
lt-LT: Kaklo grandinėlės dizainas: Karoliai; Grandinėlė; Čokeris; Virvelė; Standus; Lariat; Su pakabuku; Riviera; Stambus; Plonas; Y formos; Kita
ro-RO: Design colier: Cu mărgele; Lanț; Choker; Șnur; Lat; Lariat; Pandantiv; Riviera; Distinctiv; Șirag; În formă de Y; Altele
it: Design di collane: Perline; Catena; Girocollo; Cavo; Polsino; Lariat; Pendente; Riviera; Dichiarazione; Filo; A forma di Y; Altro
sl-SI: Dizajn ogrlice: Perle; Verižica; Choker; Vrvica; Manšeta; Lariat; Obesek; Riviera; Vpadljiva; Drobna; V obliki črke Y; Drugo
bg-BG: Дизайн на колие: С мъниста; Верига; Брошка; Шнур; Маншети; Lariat; Висулка; Ривиера; Изразително; Нишки; Y-образно; Други
hu: Nyakláncdesign: Gyöngy; Lánc; Rövid nyaklánc; Zsinóros; Nyakék; Lariát; Medállal; Riviera; Statement; Fonatos; Y alakú; Egyéb
da: Halskædedesign: Perlebesat; Kæde; Choker; Snor; Cuff; Lariat; Pendant; Riviera; Statement; Strand; V-formet; Andet
fi: Kaulakorun suunnittelu: Helmitetty; Ketju; Kaulanauha; Punosnauha; Kalvosin; Lariat; Riipus; Riviera; Statement; Strand; Y-muotoinen; Muu
sv: Design på halsband: Med pärlor; Kedja; Choker; Kedja; Manschett; Lariat; Hängsmycke; Riviera; Statement; Strand; Y-formad; Övrigt
nb: Halskjededesign: Perle; Kjede; Choker; Ledning; Mansjett; Lariat; Anheng; Riviera; Uttalelse; Tråd; Y-formet; Annet
th: การออกแบบสร้อยคอ: แหวนลูกปัด; แหวนโซ่; Choker; Cord; Cuff; Lariat; จี้; Riviera; Statement; Strand; Y-shaped; อื่นๆ
es: Diseño de collar: Con cuentas; Cadena; Gargantilla; Cordón; Brazalete; Lariat; Colgante; Riviera; Llamativo; Hilo; En Y; Otros
hr-HR: Dizajn ogrlice: Perlice; Lančić; Choker; Uzica; Kruta; Larijat; Privjesak; Rivijera; Odvažna; Nizana; U obliku slova Y; Ostalo
zh-TW: 項鏈設計: 串珠; 鏈條; 項圈; 繩索; 袖口; 套索; 吊墜; Riviera; 陳述; 股; Y 型; 其他
ja: ネックレスデザイン: ビーズ; チェーン; チョーカー; コード; カフ; ラリアット; ペンダント; リビエラ; ステートメント; ストランド; Y型; その他
sk-SK: Dizajn náhrdelníka: Korálky; Reťaz; Choker; Šnúrka; Manžeta; Lariat; Prívesok; Riviera; Nápadný; Strand; v tvare Y; Iné
zh-CN: 项链设计: 串珠戒指; 链式戒指; 颈链; 结绳项链; 开口式戒指; 套索项链; 吊坠; Riviera 宝石/珍珠串链; 个性项链; 串链项链; Y 形项链; 其他
ru: Дизайн украшения на шею: Бисерный; Цепь; Чокер; Шнур; Манжета; Лариат; Кулон; Ривьера; Массивное; Стрэнд; У-образное; Другой
tr: Kolye tasarımı: Boncuklu; Zincir; Choker; Kordon; Manşet; kement; Kolye; Riviera; İfade; İplik; Y şekilli; Diğer
pt-PT: Desenho de colar: Com contas; Corrente; Gargantilha; Cordão; Punho; Lariat; Pendente; Riviera; Declaração; Linha; Em forma de Y; Outro